Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4 Georgia Seed Development Commission

Administrative rules and regulations.

Seed Division, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-12.

2-4-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Georgia Seed Development Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 83, § 1.

2-4-2.
Seed Development Commission — Creation; corporate powers.

As used in this chapter, the term “commission” means the Georgia Seed Development Commission.

There is created a body corporate and politic and an instrumentality and public corporation of this state, to be known as the Georgia Seed Development Commission. It shall have perpetual existence. In such name, it may contract and be contracted with, sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts.

The commission is assigned to the Department of Agriculture for administrative purposes only, as prescribed in Code Section 50-4-3.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 83, § 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 508.

2-4-3.
Seed Development Commission — Composition; officers; bylaws; quorum; compensation; records; audit; bonds.

As used in this Code section, the term “licensee” means the designee of a holder of a license authorizing the production, conditioning, propagation, or marketing of crops, seed, turfgrass, or horticultural plants developed by the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia, where such license grants rights to intellectual property owned by the University of Georgia or a formally designated cooperative organization thereof.

The commission shall be composed of the following 11 members:

Two members to be appointed by the Governor, each of whom shall be a licensee or shall be otherwise involved in the production, conditioning, or marketing of crops, seed, turfgrass, or horticultural plants.

No later than May 31, 2021, the Governor shall appoint two members as provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph whose terms shall begin on July 1, 2021, and such members and their successors shall serve terms of four years. The terms of the members appointed as provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and serving as of June 30, 2021, shall terminate on that date;

One member who shall be a licensee or shall be otherwise involved in the production, conditioning, or marketing of crops, seed, turfgrass, or horticultural plants, to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor.

No later than May 31, 2021, the Lieutenant Governor shall appoint a member as provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph whose term shall begin on July 1, 2021, and such member shall serve a single term of five years. The successors to the member whose term ends on June 30, 2026, shall serve terms of four years that begin on July 1 of the year of their appointment. The term of the member appointed as provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and serving as of June 30, 2021, shall terminate on that date;

One member who shall be a licensee or shall be otherwise involved in the production, conditioning, or marketing of crops, seed, turfgrass, or horticultural plants, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

No later than May 31, 2021, the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint a member as provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph whose term shall begin on July 1, 2021, and such member shall serve a single term of five years. The successors to the member whose term ends on June 30, 2026, shall serve terms of four years that begin on July 1 of the year of their appointment. The term of the member appointed as provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and serving as of June 30, 2021, shall terminate on that date;

The Commissioner of Agriculture or his or her designee;

Two representatives of the crop, seed, turfgrass, or horticultural plant industry or of farm related organizations, one of whom shall be appointed by the Senate Agriculture and Consumer Affairs Committee, and one of whom shall be appointed by the House Committee on Agriculture and Consumer Affairs. Such representatives shall be licensees or shall otherwise have knowledge of the production, conditioning, or marketing of crops, seed, turfgrass, or horticultural plants. Each committee shall make its appointment with a quorum present and a majority of those present concurring.

No later than May 31, 2022, two members shall be appointed as provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph whose terms shall begin on July 1, 2022, and such members shall serve a single term of six years. The successors to the two members whose terms end on June 30, 2028, shall serve terms of four years that begin on July 1 of the year of their appointment. The terms of the members appointed as provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and serving as of June 30, 2021, shall terminate on that date;

One member who shall be a licensee or shall be otherwise involved in the production, conditioning, or marketing of crops, seed, turfgrass, or horticultural plants, to be appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture.

No later than May 31, 2022, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall appoint a member as provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph whose term shall begin on July 1, 2022, and such member shall serve a single term of five years. The successors to the member whose term ends on June 30, 2027, shall serve terms of four years that begin on July 1 of the year of their appointment. The term of the member appointed as provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and serving as of June 30, 2021, shall terminate on that date;

The dean of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia;

The associate dean for research of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia, as a nonvoting member; and

An additional nonvoting member who is a crop, seed, turfgrass, or horticultural plant breeder employed by the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia, appointed by the dean of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia, after consultation with the commission.

No later than May 31, 2022, the dean of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia shall appoint a member as provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph whose term shall begin on July 1, 2022, and such member shall serve a single term of five years. The successors to the member whose term ends on June 30, 2027, shall serve terms of four years that begin on July 1 of the year of their appointment. The term of the member appointed as provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and serving as of June 30, 2021, shall terminate on that date.

The members of the commission shall enter upon their duties without further act or formality. The commission shall organize each odd-numbered year at the meeting next following July 1 of such year, at which time the commission shall elect one of its members as chairperson and another as vice chairperson. It shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer, who need not be members. The offices of secretary and treasurer may be combined in one person. The commission may make such bylaws for its government as it deems necessary but is under no duty to do so.

Five voting members of the commission shall constitute a quorum necessary for the transaction of business, and a majority vote of those present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be sufficient to do and perform any action permitted the commission by this chapter. No vacancy on the commission shall impair the right of a quorum to transact any and all business of the commission.

The members shall not receive compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

Members of the commission shall be accountable as trustees. They shall cause adequate books and records of all transactions of the commission, including records of income and disbursements of every nature, to be kept. The books and records shall be inspected and audited by the state auditor at least once in each year. The commission may require that an employee, an officer, member of the commission, or any person doing business with the commission post a bond, in an amount to be determined by the commission, for the faithful performance of the duties imposed upon such employee, officer, member of the commission, or person doing business with the commission. The principal of such bond of an officer, employee, or member of the commission shall be paid by the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 83, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 348, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 309, § 1/SB 515; Ga. L. 2016, p. 742, § 1/HB 1030; Ga. L. 2020, p. 352, § 1/HB 894.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, rewrote subsection (b) and substituted “odd-numbered” for “even-numbered” in the second sentence of subsection (c).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, “June 30, 2021” was substituted for “June, 30, 2021” near the end of subparagraph (b)(5)(B).

2-4-4.
Seed Development Commission — Powers and duties generally.

The commission shall have, in addition to any other powers conferred in this chapter, the following powers:

To have a seal and to alter it at its pleasure;

To acquire by purchase, lease, gift, or otherwise and to hold, lease, and dispose of, in any manner, real and personal property of every kind and character for its corporate purposes;

To appoint such additional officers, who need not be members of the commission, as the commission deems advisable; to employ such experts, agents, and employees as in its judgment may be necessary to carry on properly the business of the commission; to fix the compensation for such officers, experts, agents, and employees; and to promote and discharge them;

To make such contracts and agreements as are legitimate and necessary for the purposes of this chapter and to make all other contracts and agreements as may be necessary to the proper performance of any action permitted by this chapter;

To exercise any power granted to private corporations which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state nor with other provisions of this chapter;

To do and perform all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers conferred upon the commission by this chapter;

To promote scientific and educational objectives in connection with the production and distribution of foundation seed stocks;

To cooperate and contract with the experiment stations of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia, the Department of Agriculture of this state, the United States Department of Agriculture, and any other agency of the state or federal government in making foundation seeds of superior varieties and hybrids available in adequate quantities, according to the requirements and needs of the farmers of this state;

To receive and to be the agent for breeder’s seed and other parent material distributed from the experiment stations of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia and other sources;

To contract for the production and promotion of foundation seed from breeder’s seed;

To purchase, process, and resell breeder’s and foundation seeds from contract growers, the United States Department of Agriculture, experiment stations of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia, and other breeders or from other sources, as the commission may deem necessary;

To use the net proceeds from the sale of seed for necessary buildings, equipment, supplies, and expenses, as directed by the commission;

To solicit, receive, collect, and disburse dues, funds, pledges, and other subscriptions of value in connection with carrying out the purposes of this chapter;

To receive real and personal property, either by gift, grant, devise, or will, and to hold and dispose of the same in carrying out the purposes of the commission; and

To buy, sell, and trade in all the elements necessary for the successful administration of the purposes of the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 83, § 5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 2.

2-4-5.
Seed Development Commission — Purchase contracts.

All contracts for the purchase of supplies or equipment by the commission for any purpose whatever shall be made only after competitive sealed bids have been received.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 83, § 7.

2-4-6.
Seed Development Commission — Operation on nonprofit basis.

It is the intent and purpose of the General Assembly that the commission shall be operated on a nonprofit basis. Any and all profits earned, beyond those required as a reasonable reserve for the future operations of the commission, shall be transmitted to the state treasury.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 83, § 9.

2-4-7.
Advisory board created; members; function.

The commission may appoint an advisory board, consisting of such number and qualifications of members as the commission may determine, to advise and consult with the commission in the performance of the commission’s duties. The function of such a board shall be advisory only.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 83, § 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 309, § 2/SB 515.

2-4-8.
[Reserved] Terms of office of appointed members of commission and board.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 1106, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 309, § 3/SB 515; repealed by Ga. L. 2021, p. 614, § 1/SB 247, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 614, § 1/SB 247 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2021.

2-4-9.
Conveyance of state property to commission; consideration; reversion for nonuse.

The Governor is authorized to convey to the commission on behalf of the state any real or personal property or interest therein owned by the state in furtherance of this chapter. The consideration for such conveyance shall be determined by the Governor and expressed in the conveyance, provided that such consideration shall be nominal, the benefits going to the state and its citizens constituting full and adequate consideration. If, within one year after a conveyance by the Governor, use of the property conveyed has not been made by the commission, such property or interest shall revert to the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 83, § 6.

2-4-10.
Debt or pledge of credit of state not authorized.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed in any manner as authorizing the creation of a debt of the State of Georgia or a pledge of the credit of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 83, § 8.